Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.618

In utero exposure to cytomegalovirus—Educational resources.

Subject to amounts appropriated specifically for this purpose, the department shall develop and make available educational resources for pregnant individuals about the nature and consequences of in utero exposure to cytomegalovirus and strategies to reduce the transmission of cytomegalovirus. The educational resources may include, but are not limited to, courses delivered in-person or electronically, pamphlets printed on paper and distributed through the watch me grow program, social media content, or made available on the department's website. The department shall also provide educational materials and outreach for providers regarding the strategies to reduce transmission of cytomegalovirus. The educational materials are intended to lower cytomegalovirus infection rates among pregnant individuals to save lives and prevent disability in their unborn children.

[ 2024 c 96 s 2.]